apertium-sme-smj.sme.lexc
LEXICON BOAHTINLONGSHORT  ! Deverbal nouns
 +N+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Nom+Use/Ped:%> PxC ; !
 +N+SgCmp:%>X7 R ;
 +N+SgCmp:%> R ;
 +N+Der/viđá+Adv:»X7#viđá K ;
! +N+Der/viđi+Adv:»X7#viđi K ;
 +N+Der/viđá+Adv:»#viđá K ;
! +N+Der/viđi+Adv:»#viđi K ;
 +N+SgNomCmp:X7# VEARA ;
 +N+SgNomCmp:# VEARA ;
 +N+Ess:%>in K ;   ! Dialects
 +N+Ess:%>en K ;   !Dialects
 +N+Ess:%>e K ;    ! Dialects
 +N+Sg+Gen:%>a K ;
 +N+Sg+Gen+Use/Ped:%> PxC ; !
 +N+SgGenCmp:%>a R ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:%>a K ;
!+Sg+Acc:%> K ; ! We suspect the Acc is never short
 +N+Sg+Acc+Use/Ped:%> PxC ; !
 +N+Pl+Nom:%>at K ;
 +N+Pl+Nom+Use/Ped:%>ijddá%> Px1V ; !
 +N+Sg+Ill:%>ij K ;
 +N+Sg+Ill+Use/Ped:%>asa%> PxV ; !
 +N+Sg+Loc:%>is K ;
 +N+Sg+Com:%>ijn K ;
 +N+Pl+Gen:%>ijd K ;
 +N+PlGenCmp:%>ijd R ;
 +N+Pl+Acc:%>ijd K ;
 +N+Pl+Ill:%>ijdda K ;
 +N+Pl+Loc:%>ijn K ;
 +N+Pl+Com:%>ijgujn K ;
 +N+Sg+Loc+Use/Ped:%>istti%> PxV ; !
 +N+Sg+Com+Use/Ped:%>ijnni%> PxV ; !
! +Pl+Nom:%>ijddi%> PxV ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Gen+Use/Ped:%>ijddi%> PxV ; !
 +N+Pl+Acc+Use/Ped:%>ijddi%> PxV ; !
 +N+Pl+Ill+Use/Ped:%>ijddás%> PxC ; !
 +N+Pl+Loc+Use/Ped:%>ijnni%> PxV ; !
 +N+Pl+Com+Use/Ped:%>ijddi%> PxPlComV1 ; !

LEXICON BOAHTIN  ! Long compound-forms
 +N+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
 +N+SgCmp:%> R ;
 +N+Der/viđá+Adv:»#viđá K ;
! +N+Der/viđi+Adv:»#viđi K ;
 +N+SgNomCmp:# VEARA ;
 +N+Ess:%>in K ;   ! Dialects
 +N+Ess:%>en K ;   !Dialects
 +N+Ess:%>e K ;    ! Dialects
 +N+Sg+Gen:%>a K ;
 +N+SgGenCmp:%>a R ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:%>a K ;
!+Sg+Acc:%> K ; ! We suspect the Acc is never short
 +N+Pl+Nom:%>at K ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:%>ij K ;
 +N+Sg+Loc:%>is K ;
 +N+Sg+Com:%>ijn K ;
 +N+Pl+Gen:%>ijd K ;
 +N+PlGenCmp:%>ijd R ;
 +N+Pl+Acc:%>ijd K ;
 +N+Pl+Ill:%>ijdda K ;
 +N+Pl+Loc:%>ijn K ;
 +N+Pl+Com:%>ijgujn K ;
 +N+Sg+Nom+Use/Ped:%> PxC ; !
 +N+Sg+Gen+Use/Ped:%> PxC ; !
 +N+Sg+Acc+Use/Ped:%> PxC ; !
 +N+Sg+Ill+Use/Ped:%>asa%> PxV ; !
 +N+Sg+Loc+Use/Ped:%>istti%> PxV ; !
 +N+Sg+Com+Use/Ped:%>ijnni%> PxV ; !
 +N+Pl+Nom+Use/Ped:%>ijddá%> Px1V ; !
! +Pl+Nom:%>ijddi%> PxV ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Gen+Use/Ped:%>ijddi%> PxV ; !
 +N+Pl+Acc+Use/Ped:%>ijddi%> PxV ; !
 +N+Pl+Ill+Use/Ped:%>ijddás%> PxC ; !
 +N+Pl+Loc+Use/Ped:%>ijnni%> PxV ; !
 +N+Pl+Com+Use/Ped:%>ijddi%> PxPlComV1 ; !

LEXICON BOAHTINSHORT  ! Short compound-forms
 +N+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
 +N+SgCmp:%>X7 R ;
 +N+Der/viđá+Adv:»X7#viđá K ;
! +N+Der/viđi+Adv:»X7#viđi K ;
 +N+SgNomCmp:X7# VEARA ;
 +N+Ess:%>in K ;   ! Dialects
 +N+Ess:%>en K ;   !Dialects
 +N+Ess:%>e K ;    ! Dialects
 +N+Sg+Gen:%>a K ;
 +N+SgGenCmp:%>a R ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:%>a K ;
!+Sg+Acc:%> K ; ! We suspect the Acc is never short
 +N+Pl+Nom:%>at K ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:%>ij K ;
 +N+Sg+Loc:%>is K ;
 +N+Sg+Com:%>ijn K ;
 +N+Pl+Gen:%>ijd K ;
 +N+PlGenCmp:%>ijd R ;
 +N+Pl+Acc:%>ijd K ;
 +N+Pl+Ill:%>ijdda K ;
 +N+Pl+Loc:%>ijn K ;
 +N+Pl+Com:%>ijgujn K ;
 +N+Sg+Nom+Use/Ped:%> PxC ; !
 +N+Sg+Gen+Use/Ped:%> PxC ; !
 +N+Sg+Acc+Use/Ped:%> PxC ; !
 +N+Sg+Ill+Use/Ped:%>asa%> PxV ; !
 +N+Sg+Loc+Use/Ped:%>istti%> PxV ; !
 +N+Sg+Com+Use/Ped:%>ijnni%> PxV ; !
 +N+Pl+Nom+Use/Ped:%>ijddá%> Px1V ; !
! +Pl+Nom:%>ijddi%> PxV ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Gen+Use/Ped:%>ijddi%> PxV ; !
 +N+Pl+Acc+Use/Ped:%>ijddi%> PxV ; !
 +N+Pl+Ill+Use/Ped:%>ijddás%> PxC ; !
 +N+Pl+Loc+Use/Ped:%>ijnni%> PxV ; !
 +N+Pl+Com+Use/Ped:%>ijddi%> PxPlComV1 ; !

LEXICON BOAHTALADDAN  ! No compound-forms, but reintroduced
 +N+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
 +N+SgCmp:%> R ;
 +N+Der/viđá+Adv:»#viđá K ;
! +N+Der/viđi+Adv:»#viđi K ;
 +N+SgNomCmp:# VEARA ;
 +N+Ess:%>in K ;
 +N+Ess:%>en K ;   !Dialects
 +N+Ess:%>e K ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:%>a K ;
 +N+SgGenCmp:%>a R ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:%>a K ;
!+Sg+Acc:%> K ; ! We suspect the Acc is never short
 +N+Pl+Nom:%>at K ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:%>ij K ;
 +N+Sg+Loc:%>is K ;
 +N+Sg+Com:%>ijn K ;
 +N+Pl+Gen:%>ijd K ;
 +N+PlGenCmp:%>ijd R ;
 +N+Pl+Acc:%>ijd K ;
 +N+Pl+Ill:%>ijdda K ;
 +N+Pl+Loc:%>ijn K ;
 +N+Pl+Com:%>ijgujn K ;
 +N+Sg+Nom+Use/Ped:%> PxC ; !
 +N+Sg+Gen+Use/Ped:%> PxC ; !
 +N+Sg+Acc+Use/Ped:%> PxC ; !
 +N+Sg+Ill+Use/Ped:%>asa%> PxV ; !
 +N+Sg+Loc+Use/Ped:%>istti%> PxV ; !
 +N+Sg+Com+Use/Ped:%>ijnni%> PxV ; !
! +Pl+Nom:%>ijddi%> PxV ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Gen+Use/Ped:%>ijddi%> PxV ; !
 +N+Pl+Acc+Use/Ped:%>ijddi%> PxV ; !
 +N+Pl+Ill+Use/Ped:%>ijddás%> PxC ; !
 +N+Pl+Loc+Use/Ped:%>ijnni%> PxV ; !
 +N+Pl+Com+Use/Ped:%>ijddi%> PxPlComV1 ; !

LEXICON BOAHTINLONGSHORTTV   !+CmpN/Sg +CmpN/DefSgGen +CmpN/DefPlGen +CmpN/SgLeft +CmpN/SgNomLeft +CmpN/SgGenLeft +CmpN/PlGenLeft
 +N+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Nom+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+Use/Ped:%> PxC ; !
 +N+SgCmp:%>X7 R ;
 +N+SgCmp:%> R ;
 +N+Der/viđá+Adv:»X7#viđá K ;
! +N+Der/viđi+Adv:»X7#viđi K ;
 +N+Der/viđá+Adv:»#viđá K ;
! +N+Der/viđi+Adv:»#viđi K ;
 +N+SgNomCmp:X7# VEARA ;
 +N+SgNomCmp:# VEARA ;
 +N+Ess:%>in K ;   ! Dialects
 +N+Ess:%>en K ;   !Dialects
 +N+Ess:%>e K ;    ! Dialects
 +N+Sg+Gen:%>a K ;
 +N+SgGenCmp:%>a R ;
 +N+Sg+Gen+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+Use/Ped:%> PxC ; !
 +N+Sg+Acc:%>a K ;
!+Sg+Acc:%> K ; ! We suspect the Acc is never short
 +N+Sg+Acc+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+Use/Ped:%> PxC ; !
 +N+Pl+Nom:%>at K ;
 +N+Pl+Nom+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+Use/Ped:%>ijddá%> Px1V ; !
 +N+Sg+Ill:%>ij K ;
 +N+Sg+Ill+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+Use/Ped:%>asa%> PxV ; !
 +N+Sg+Loc:%>is K ;
 +N+Sg+Com:%>ijn K ;
 +N+Pl+Gen:%>ijd K ;
 +N+PlGenCmp:%>ijd R ;
 +N+Pl+Acc:%>ijd K ;
 +N+Pl+Ill:%>ijdda K ;
 +N+Pl+Loc:%>ijn K ;
 +N+Pl+Com:%>ijgujn K ;
 +N+Sg+Loc+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+Use/Ped:%>istti%> PxV ; !
 +N+Sg+Com+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+Use/Ped:%>ijnni%> PxV ; !
! +Pl+Nom:%>ijddi%> PxV ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Gen+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+Use/Ped:%>ijddi%> PxV ; !
 +N+Pl+Acc+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+Use/Ped:%>ijddi%> PxV ; !
 +N+Pl+Ill+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+Use/Ped:%>ijddás%> PxC ; !
 +N+Pl+Loc+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+Use/Ped:%>ijnni%> PxV ; !
 +N+Pl+Com+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+Use/Ped:%>ijddi%> PxPlComV1 ; !

LEXICON NounRoot
 ámta#mánni#gohččun+CmpN/Sg:ámta#mánni#gohččum BOAHTIN ; !
 árga#beai#eallin+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:árga#beai#eallim BOAHTINLONGSHORT ; !
 bahkadas#gieđahallan+CmpN/Sg:bahkadas#gieđahallam BOAHTALADDAN ; !
 báhppaluddan+CmpN/Sg:báhppaluddam BOAHTALADDAN ; !
 báhppaluddan+CmpN/Sg:báhppaluddam BOAHTALADDAN ; !
 bálká#šiehtadallan+CmpN/Sg:bálká#šiehtadallam BOAHTIN ; !
 bievla#guohtun+CmpN/Sg:bievla#guohtum BOAHTINLONGSHORT ; !
 bihkka#boaldin+CmpN/Sg:bihkka#boaldim BOAHTINLONGSHORT ; !
 biras#gáhtten+CmpN/Sg:biras#gáhttem BOAHTIN ; !
 boađus#árvvoštallan+CmpN/Sg:boađus#árvvoštallam BOAHTALADDAN ; !
 boađus#logahallan+CmpN/Sg:boađus#logahallam BOAHTALADDAN ; !
 bušeahtta#digaštallan+CmpN/Sg:bušeahtta#digaštallam BOAHTALADDAN ; !
 čakča#guohtun+CmpN/Sg:čakča#guohtum BOAHTINLONGSHORT ; !
 čállin+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:čállim BOAHTIN ; !
 čuolbma#meroštallan+CmpN/Sg:čuolbma#meroštallam BOAHTALADDAN ; !
 čuovga#máŋgen+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:čuovga#máŋgem BOAHTIN ; !
 dásádat#logahallan+CmpN/Sg:dásádat#logahallam BOAHTALADDAN ; !
 dinen+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:dinem BOAHTIN ; !
 doarjja#čuorvun+CmpN/Sg:doarjja#čuorvum BOAHTIN ; !
 doarrádallan+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:doarrádallam BOAHTALADDAN ; !
 duohtavuođa#válddahallan+CmpN/Sg:duohtavuođa#válddahallam BOAHTALADDAN ; !
 duođaštus#árvvoštallan+CmpN/Sg:duođaštus#árvvoštallam BOAHTALADDAN ; !
 ealáhus#dárkon+CmpN/Sg:ealáhus#dárkom BOAHTIN ; !
 eallin+CmpN/Sg:eallim BOAHTINLONGSHORT ; !
 eana#ávkkástallan+CmpN/Sg:eana#ávkkástallam BOAHTALADDAN ; !
 eret#bidjan+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:eret#bidjam BOAHTIN ; !
 fierran+CmpN/Sg:fierram BOAHTIN ; !
 gaska#sárggá#russen+CmpN/Sg:gaska#sárggá#russem BOAHTIN ; !
 giđđa#guohtun+CmpN/Sg:giđđa#guohtum BOAHTINLONGSHORT ; !
 giehta#speažžun+CmpN/Sg:giehta#speažžum BOAHTIN ; !
 giella#gáhtten+CmpN/Sg:giella#gáhttem BOAHTIN ; !
 girje#čállin+CmpN/Sg:girje#čállim BOAHTIN ; !
 govva#čállin+CmpN/Sg:govva#čállim BOAHTIN ; !
 guohtun+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:guohtum BOAHTINLONGSHORT ; !
 guovddáš#váráiduhttin+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:guovddáš#váráiduhttim BOAHTALADDAN ; !
 hállan+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:hállam BOAHTIN ; !
 hearrástallan+CmpN/Sg:hearrástallam BOAHTALADDAN ; !
 hutkan+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:hutkam BOAHTIN ; !
 interpellašuvdna#digaštallan+CmpN/Sg:interpellašuvdna#digaštallam BOAHTALADDAN ; !
 jiellun+CmpN/Sg:jiellum BOAHTIN ; !
 lađastallan+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:lađastallam BOAHTALADDAN ; !
 lága#rihkkun+CmpN/Sg:lága#rihkkum BOAHTIN ; !
 lávlun+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:lávlum BOAHTIN ; !
 leahkin+CmpN/Sg:leahkim BOAHTALADDAN ; !
 ludden+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:luddem BOAHTIN ; !
 mannan+CmpN/Sg:mannam BOAHTIN ; !
 miella#govahallan+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:miella#govahallam BOAHTALADDAN ; !
 namma#čuorvun+CmpN/Sg:namma#čuorvum BOAHTIN ; !
 oaggun+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:oaggum BOAHTIN ; !
 olggoš#gieđahallan+CmpN/Sg:olggoš#gieđahallam BOAHTALADDAN ; !
 olgunastin+CmpN/Sg:olgunastim BOAHTALADDAN ; !
 olmmoš#goddin+CmpN/Sg:olmmoš#goddim BOAHTIN ; !
 panela#digaštallan+CmpN/Sg:panela#digaštallam BOAHTALADDAN ; !
 prinsihppa#digaštallan+CmpN/Sg:prinsihppa#digaštallam BOAHTALADDAN ; !
 publikašuvdna#logahallan+CmpN/Sg:publikašuvdna#logahallam BOAHTALADDAN ; !
 rátkka#čiekčan+CmpN/Sg:rátkka#čiekčam BOAHTIN ; !
 rehket#doallo#lađastallan+CmpN/Sg:rehket#doallo#lađastallam BOAHTALADDAN ; !
 reive#lonohallan+CmpN/Sg:reive#lonohallam BOAHTALADDAN ; !
 repetišuvdna#hárjehallan+CmpN/Sg:repetišuvdna#hárjehallam BOAHTALADDAN ; !
 re^plihkka#vurostallan+CmpN/Sg:re^plihkka#vurostallam BOAHTALADDAN ; !
 resepta#viežžan+CmpN/Sg+Use/Sub:resepta#viežžam BOAHTIN ; !
 ruhtadeami#lađastallan+CmpN/Sg:ruhtadeami#lađastallam BOAHTALADDAN ; !
 rudne#guohtun+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:rudne#guohtum BOAHTINLONGSHORT ; !
 rumaš#rahpan+CmpN/Sg:rumaš#rahpam BOAHTIN ; !
 ruhta#bidjan+CmpN/Sg:ruhta#bidjam BOAHTIN ; !
 rumašvuogáiduvvan+CmpN/Sg:rumašvuogáiduvvam BOAHTALADDAN ; !
 ruhtadeami#lađastallan+CmpN/Sg:ruhtadeami#lađastallam BOAHTALADDAN ; !
 ruohttan+CmpN/Sg:ruohttam BOAHTIN ; !
 servodat#eallin+CmpN/Sg:servodat#eallim BOAHTINLONGSHORT ; !
 sihkkelastin+CmpN/Sg:sihkkelastim BOAHTIN ; !
 skuter#vuodjin+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:skuter#vuodjim BOAHTINLONGSHORT ; !
 skuvla#árvvoštallan+CmpN/Sg:skuvla#árvvoštallam BOAHTALADDAN ; !
 stávrá#njuiken+CmpN/Sg:stávrá#njuikem BOAHTIN ; !
 telefon#ságastallan+CmpN/Sg:telefon#ságastallam BOAHTALADDAN ; !
 transfušuvdna#dálkun+CmpN/Sg:transfušuvdna#dálkum BOAHTIN ; !
vahágahtton:vahágahttom BOAHTALADDAN ;
 válga#loahppa#rehkenastin+CmpN/Sg:válga#loahppa#rehkenastim BOAHTALADDAN ; !
 varra#iskan+CmpN/Sg:varra#iskam BOAHTIN ; !
 vuokta#bassan+SgCm:vuokta#bassam BOAHTIN ; !
 vuosttas#dikšun+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:vuosttas#dikšum BOAHTIN ; !
